District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-221.04

Auditor’s report of corporate officers.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1317, ch. 854, § 771
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(3), 58 DCR 1720

History

2001 Ed., § 29-221.04.
1981 Ed., § 29-404.
1973 Ed., § 29-704.

Prior Codifications